Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,181
Truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus; no additional registration or license fees required; when.

(1) When a truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus has been duly registered in any jurisdiction, including those that are part of a Nebraska-based fleet registered pursuant to section 60-3,198, no additional registration or license fees, except as provided in section 60-3,203 if applicable, shall be required in this state when such truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus is operated in combination with any truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus properly licensed or registered in accordance with sections 60-3,179 to 60-3,182 and 60-3,198 or agreements, arrangements, or declarations pursuant to such sections.

(2) Properly registered means a truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus licensed or registered in one of the following: (a) The jurisdiction where the person registering the truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus has his or her legal residence; (b) the jurisdiction in which a truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus is registered, when the operation in which such truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus is used has a principal place of business therein, and from or in which the truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus is most frequently dispatched, garaged, serviced, maintained, operated, or otherwise controlled and the truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus is assigned to such principal place of business; or (c) the jurisdiction where, because of an agreement or arrangement between two or more jurisdictions or pursuant to a declaration, the person registering the truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus has licensed the truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or bus as required by such jurisdiction.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 181.